Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3410
Power of attorney; duration.

A power of attorney for health care shall continue in effect until the principal's death, until revoked pursuant to section 30-3420, or until the attorney in fact and any successor attorney in fact withdraws pursuant to section 30-3407.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 10.